en: speckled Scallop
de: Gefleckte Jakobsmuschel
fr: Pétoncle moucheté
hr: pjegava jakobova kapica
it: capesante maculate
la: Argopecten irradians concentricus, Argopecten circularis

en: white scallop
de: Weiße Jakobsmuschel
fr: Pétoncle blanc
hr: bijela kapica
it: capesante bianche
la: Chlamys albida, Chlamys albidus

en: sea squirt
ar: كيسيات
az: Asisidlər
be: Асцыдыі
bg: Асцидии
ca: Ascídia
cs: Sumky
da: Søpunge
de: Seescheiden
es: Ascidiáceos
eu: Aszidia
fa: کوزه‌داران
fi: merituppi, meritupet
fr: Ascidie
gl: Ascidiáceos
he: אסצידיות
hr: morski mlaz
hu: Aszcídiák
hy: Ասցիդիաներ
it: ascidia
ja: ホヤ綱
ka: ასციდიები
kk: Асцидиялар
ko: 해초강
ky: Асцидиялар
la: Ascidiacea
lt: Ascidijos
lv: Ascīdijas
mk: Асцидија
nl: Zakpijpen
nn: sekkdyr
nv: Níyizii dahinánígíí
oc: Ascídies
pl: Żachwy
ru: асцидии
sk: Ascídie
sv: Sjöpungar
te: అసిడియేషియా
tg: Ассидияҳо
th: เพรียงหัวหอม
uk: Асцидії
zh: 海鞘

en: snail
am: ቀንድ አውጣ
an: Caragol
ar: حلزون
ay: Ch'uru
az: İlbiz
bg: охлюв, охлюви
bn: শামুক
br: Melc'hwed-krogennek
ca: Cargol de terra
ce: АьттамаьгӀаг
cv: Шуйсем
cy: Malwen
de: Schnecke
el: Σαλιγκάρι
eo: Heliko
es: caracol, caracoles
eu: Barraskilo
fa: حلزون
fi: etana, etanat
fr: escargot, escargots
ga: Seilide
gd: seilcheag
gl: Caracol
gn: Jatyta
hr: puž
ht: Kalmason
ia: Coclea
id: Siput
io: Heliko
it: chiocciola
ja: カタツムリ
kn: ಬಸವನ ಹುಳು
ko: 달팽이
la: Cochlea
lt: Sraigė
lv: Gliemezis
ml: ഒച്ച്
mr: गोगलगाय
ms: Siput
ne: शंखेकीरा
nl: slak, slakken
oc: Cagaraula
os: Сæтæлæг
pl: Ślimak
pt: caracol
qu: Ch'uru
ro: Melc
ru: улитка, улитки, ракушки
sn: Hozhwa
sr: Пужеви
sv: snigel
sw: Konokono
ta: நத்தை
te: నత్త
th: หอยทาก
tl: Kuhol
tr: Salyangoz
uk: Равлик
ur: گھونگھا
vi: Ốc
wa: Caracole
za: Saehaexma
zh: 蜗牛

en: Teuthida
xx: Teuthida
la: Teuthida

en: squid
af: Pylinkvis
ar: سبيدج
az: Kalmarlar
be: Кальмары
bg: Калмари
bn: স্কুইড
ca: calamar
cs: Krakatice
da: blæksprutte
de: Kalmare
el: Καλαμάρι
eo: Kalamaro
es: calamar, calamares, pota
et: Kalmaarilised
eu: Txipiroi
fa: ماهی مرکب
fi: kalmari, kalmarit
fr: calamar, calamars, encornet, encornets, calmar, calmars
ga: Scuid
gl: Lura
gn: Kalama
he: דיונוני רחף
hi: विद्रूप
hr: lignje
hu: Kalmárok
hy: Կաղամարներ
id: Cumi-cumi
io: Kalmaro
is: Smokkfiskur
it: calamaro, calamari
ja: ツツイカ目, イカ
jv: Iwak Nus
ka: კალმარები
kk: Кальмар
ko: 살오징어목
ky: Кальмарлар
la: loligo spp
lt: Kalmarai
lv: Kalmāri
ml: കൂന്തൾ
ms: Sotong
my: ပြည်ကြီးငါး
nl: pijlinktvissen
nv: Łóóʼ bigaan neeznání íiyisígíí
pl: kałamarnice, kałamarnica
pt: Lula
qu: Samanna
ro: Calmar
ru: кальмары, кальмар
sh: Lignje
sk: Kalmary
sl: Lignji
sr: Лигње
su: Cumi-cumi
sw: Ngisi
ta: கணவாய்
th: หมึกกล้วย
tl: Pusit
tr: Kalamar
uk: Кальмари
ur: قیر ماہی مچھلی
uz: Kalmarlar
vi: Bộ Mực ống
zh: 十腕总目

en: european flying squid
hr: europska leteća lignja
it: totano, totani
la: todarodes sagittatus

en: baby squid
de: Baby-Kalmare
es: Chipirones
hr: bebe lignje
it: calamaretti

en: argentine shortfin squid, Illex Argentinus
bg: морски мекотели, Illex Argentinus
de: Argentinischer Kurzflossenkalmar, Illex Argentinus
es: pota argentina, calamar illex, Illex Argentinus
fi: argentiinankalmari, Illex Argentinus
fr: encornet rouge argentin, Illex Argentinus
ga: Scuid ghearreiteach na hAirgintíne, Illex Argentinus
hr: argentinska kratkoperaja lignja
it: Illex Argentinus
la: Illex Argentinus

en: Humboldt squid, Giant Squid, Chuka Ika, Dosidicus Gigas
ca: calamar gegant del corrent de Humboldt, Dosidicus Gigas
de: Riesenkalmar, Humboldt-Kalmar, Dosidicus Gigas
es: calamar de Humboldt, calamar gigante, jibia gigante, potón del Pacífico
fa: سرپاور هامبالت, Dosidicus Gigas
fi: humboldtinkalmari, Dosidicus Gigas
fr: Encornet géant, Dosidicus Gigas
ga: Ollscuid eitilte, Dosidicus Gigas
he: דיונון הומבולדט, Dosidicus Gigas
hr: humboldtova lignja
id: Cumi-cumi jumbo, Dosidicus Gigas
it: Totano gigante, Dosidicus Gigas
ja: アメリカオオアカイカ, Dosidicus Gigas
la: Dosidicus Gigas
nb: humboldtblekksprut, Dosidicus Gigas
pl: Kałamarnica Humboldta, Dosidicus Gigas
pt: Pota gigante, Lula-de-humboldt, Dosidicus Gigas
ru: Кальмар Гумбольдта, Dosidicus Gigas
sv: Humboldtbläckfisk, Dosidicus Gigas
th: หมึกฮัมโบลต์, Dosidicus Gigas
tr: Humboldt kalamarı, Dosidicus Gigas
vi: Mực Humboldt, Dosidicus Gigas
zh: 美洲大赤魷, Dosidicus Gigas

en: indian squid, Uroteuthis duvaucelii
de: indischer Tintenfisch, Uroteuthis duvaucelii
fr: calmar indien, Uroteuthis duvaucelii
hr: indijska lignja
it: calamaro indiano
la: Uroteuthis duvaucelii, Loligo duvauceli
zh: 杜氏槍魷, Uroteuthis duvaucelii

en: mitre squid, Uroteuthis chinensis
de: Uroteuthis chinensis
fr: Calmar mitre, Uroteuthis chinensis
hr: mitra lignja
it: calamaro mitra
la: Uroteuthis chinensis
zh: 中國槍魷, Uroteuthis chinensis

en: swordtip squid
de: Kalmar (Uroteuthis edulis)
fr: Calmar épée
hr: lignja na vrhu mača
it: calamaro dalla punta a spada
ja: ケンサキイカ, Uroteuthis edulis
la: Uroteuthis edulis, Loligo edulis
zh: 剑尖枪乌贼

en: Patagonian squid
de: Patagonien-Tintenfisch
es: Calamar de patagonia
fr: calmar de Patagonie
hr: patagonijska lignja
it: calamaro della Patagonia
la: Doryteuthis gahi, Loligo Gahi

en: cephalopod ink
de: Kopffüßertinte, Kopffüßer-Tinte
es: tinta de cefalopodo
fr: Encre de céphalopode
hr: tinta glavonožaca
it: inchiostro di cefalopodi

en: squid ink
de: Kalmartinte, Tintenfischtinte
es: tinta de calamar
hr: tinta lignje
it: nero di seppia

en: squid ink substitute
de: Kalmar-Tintenersatz
es: sucedáneo de tinta de calamar
hr: zamjena za crnilo squid
it: surrogato di nero di seppia

en: clam, clams
ar: ملزمي
ca: cloïssa
de: Venusmuscheln
el: Αχιβάδα
eo: pekteno
es: Almeja, almejas
eu: Txirla
fa: صدف دوکفه‌ای
fr: palourde, palourdes
ga: Breallach, breallaigh
gd: Bainteag
gl: Ameixa
he: קלאם
hr: školjka
id: Kerang
it: vongola, vongole
ja: クラム
jv: Kerang
ko: 조개
ml: കക്ക
my: ဂုံး
nl: clam
oc: Clausissa
pt: Amêijoa
su: Kerang
vi: Nghêu
zh: 蛤蜊

en: clam meat
de: Muschelfleisch
fi: simpukan liha
hr: meso školjki
it: polpa di vongole

en: pink clam, surf clam, Mesodesma donacium
de: Chilenische Trogmuschel, Mesodesma donacium
es: almejas rosadas, machas, Mesodesma donacium
hr: ružičasta školjka
it: vongola rosa
la: Mesodesma donacium